Vermont, session 2025-2026, S72.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. PUBLIC PENSION FUNDS; FOSSIL FUELS; VERMONT
PENSION INVESTMENT COMMISSION; PLAN AND REPORT
(a) Intent.
(1) It is the intent of the General Assembly that the Vermont Pension
Investment Commission build upon its effective efforts to manage the State’s
financial risks to climate change, including investing in low carbon indexes,
successfully engaging with fossil fuel and other companies, and supporting
initial studies and reviews on climate change.
(2) It is also the intent of the General Assembly that, on or before
December 31, 2030, the Vermont Pension Investment Commission shall,
consistent with sound fiduciary practice, including consideration of any
expected increased funding requirements for the actuarially determined
employer contribution (ADEC) and administrative costs, and subject to any
exceptions, divest the holdings of the Vermont State Employees’ Retirement
System, the Vermont Teachers’ Retirement System, and the Vermont
Municipal Employees’ Retirement System from the fossil fuel industry.
(3) The General Assembly also intends that the Vermont Pension
Investment Commission establish a long-term goal to divest from any private
investments that contain assets in the fossil fuel industry on or before
VT LEG #379759 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.72
2025 Page 3 of 7
December 31, 2040, if the Commission determines that such divestment is
consistent with sound fiduciary practice.
(b) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “Carbon footprint” means the extent to which holdings are invested
in stocks, securities, or other obligations of any fossil fuel company or any
subsidiary, affiliate, or parent of any fossil fuel company.
(2) “De minimis exposure” means the aggregate amount of all fossil fuel
holdings in the portfolio amounting to less than two percent of the aggregate
amount of all funds invested.
(c) Review. On or before December 15, 2025, the Vermont Pension
Investment Commission, in consultation with the Office of the State Treasurer,
shall complete a review of the carbon footprint of the holdings of the Vermont
State Employees’ Retirement System, the Vermont State Teachers’ Retirement
System, and the Vermont Municipal Employees’ Retirement System.
(d) Plan.
(1) Divestment. Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this
subsection, the Commission, in accordance with sound investment criteria and
consistent with fiduciary obligations, including consideration of any expected
increased funding requirements for the actuarially determined employer
contribution (ADEC) and administrative costs, shall develop a plan to divest
any holdings identified in the review described in subsection (c) of this section
VT LEG #379759 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.72
2025 Page 4 of 7
on or before December 31, 2030. The Commission shall include in the plan
consideration of the State’s long-term goal of divestment from any investments
that are exceptions to the plan pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection on
or before December 31, 2040.
(2) Exceptions. Until such time as the Commission deems divestment to
be prudent and consistent with sound fiduciary practice, the following holdings
are exceptions to the plan:
(A) de minimis exposure of any funds held by the Commission to the
stocks, securities, or other obligations of any fossil fuel company or any
subsidiary, affiliate, or parent of any fossil fuel company; and
(B) private investments that contain fossil fuel company stocks,
securities, or other obligations of any fossil fuel company or any subsidiary,
affiliate, or parent of any fossil fuel company.
(3) Definitions and methodology. The Commission shall include in the
plan described in this subsection:
(A) a definition for “fossil fuel company”; and
(B) a method for determining the metric of the portfolio’s carbon
footprint that allows for an exemption of private investments for the purpose of
determining the de minimis exposure.
VT LEG #379759 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.72
2025 Page 5 of 7
(e) Report.
(1) On or before February 15, 2026, the Commission shall submit a
report on the review described in subsection (c) of this section to the House
Committee on Government Operations and Military Affairs and the Senate
Committee on Government Operations and to the Joint Public Pension
Oversight Committee. The report shall include any recommendations for
legislative action, if necessary, to implement the divestment plan.
(2)(A) On or before September 1, 2026, the Commission shall submit a
report on the plan described in subsection (d) of this section to the House
Committee on Government Operations and Military Affairs and the Senate
Committee on Government Operations and to the Joint Public Pension
Oversight Committee. The report shall include any recommendations for
legislative action, if necessary, to implement the divestment plan.
(B) Pursuant to 2 V.S.A. § 23, with approval of the Speaker of the
House and the President Pro Tempore, as appropriate, the House Committee on
Government Operations and Military Affairs and the Senate Committee on
Government Operations may each meet up to one time when the General
Assembly is not in session to evaluate the report described in subdivision (A)
of this subdivision (e)(2).
(3) Beginning on January 15, 2027, and annually thereafter until January
15, 2040, the Commission shall submit a report to the House Committee on
VT LEG #379759 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.72
2025 Page 6 of 7
Government Operations and Military Affairs, the Senate Committee on
Government Operations, and the Joint Public Pension Oversight Committee on
the progress of divestment described in this section. The report shall also
include:
(A) an update on the composition and percentage of exposure of any
investments exempt from the divestment plan pursuant to subdivision (d)(2) of
this section; and
(B) a summary of the fee impacts and any instance of excessive
charges or demands related to the rebalancing of the funds consistent with the
implementation of this act.
(4) On or before January 15, 2041, the Commission shall make a final
report to the House Committee on Government Operations and Military
Affairs and the Senate Committee on Government Operations and the Joint
Public Pension Oversight Committee regarding completion of divestment
described in this section.
Sec. 2. DIVESTMENT PLAN; VERMONT PENSION INVESTMENT
COMMISSION; APPROPRIATION
In FY 2026, the amount of $127,000.00 is appropriated to the Vermont
Pension Investment Commission to establish one staff position to support
improvements and efficiencies in the administration of the Commission and to
meet the review, planning, and reporting requirements of this act. The
VT LEG #379759 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.72
2025 Page 7 of 7
appropriation to the Commission shall be distributed from the following
funding sources pursuant to the allocation set forth below:
(1) 40.86 percent from the Vermont State Retirement Fund, established
in 3 V.S.A. § 473;
(2) 44.01 percent from the Vermont Teachers’ Retirement Fund,
established in 16 V.S.A. § 1944; and
(3) 15.13 percent from the Vermont Municipal Retirement Fund,
established in 24 V.S.A. § 5064.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #379759 v.1